Maryland, session 2026, HB0342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
7–304.
(a) To qualify for a license, an applicant shall be an individual who meets the
requirements of this section.
(b) (1) An SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION PARAGRAPH
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN applicant shall have graduated on completion of a 4–year
curriculum in forestry from a college or university that is:
(1) (I) approved by the Board [or]; AND
(2) (II) accredited by:
(I) the Society of American Foresters;. OR
(II) AN EQUIVALENT ACCREDITING ENTITY.
(c) (2) The applicant shall have at least 2 years of experience in forestry that
indicates to the Board that the applicant is competent to practice forestry AN APPLICANT
MAY MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION SUBSECTION IF THE BOARD
– 1 –

Ch. 275 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DETERMINES THAT THE APPLICANT’S EDUCATION, INCLUDING A COMPARABLE
GRADUATE DEGREE OR INTERNATIONAL DEGREE, IS SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT
TO THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(c) The applicant shall have at least 2 years of experience in forestry that indicates
to the Board that the applicant is competent to practice forestry.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –